Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Chapter 9

West Tennessee Seismic Safety Commission

58-9-101. Creation of commission — Composition — Quorum — Terms of office — Compensation — Information and services from the center for earthquake research and information.

There is created the west Tennessee seismic safety commission, which shall be attached administratively to the University of Memphis.

The commission shall consist of twelve (12) members, to be appointed as follows: two (2) members chosen by the speaker of the house of representatives, two (2) members chosen by the speaker of the senate and eight (8) members appointed by the governor. The members shall include persons who represent the following professional areas: architecture, fire protection, public utilities, engineering, geology or seismology, local government, insurance, business, emergency health services, nonprofit emergency assistance, local education and emergency management.

The commission shall annually elect a chair and vice chair from its membership. A quorum shall consist of seven (7) members. All commission members shall be residents of the state and shall have reasonable knowledge of issues relating to earthquakes.

The term of office for each member of the commission shall be four (4) years, except that of the initial appointments, six (6) members shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years and six (6) members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years. Any member may be removed from office by the governor for cause. A member is eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any cause, the governor shall make an appointment for the unexpired term.

Each member of the commission shall serve without compensation, but shall receive compensation for travel expenses. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The center for earthquake research and information, created by § 49-8-602, is authorized and directed to provide any information or services requested by the commission.

Acts 2006, ch. 905, § 2.

58-9-102. Authority of commission.

The commission shall have the authority to:

Accept grants, contributions and appropriations from public agencies, private foundations or individuals;

Appoint committees from its membership, appoint advisory committees from interested public and private groups, and appoint ex officio members, to advise the commission, who shall not be entitled to vote;

Contract for or employ, subject to appropriations made for that purpose, any professional and research services required by the commission or required for the performance of necessary work and services that, in the commission's opinion, cannot satisfactorily be performed by its officers and employees or by other federal, state or local governmental agencies;

Enter into agreements to act cooperatively with private nonprofit scientific, educational or professional associations or foundations engaged in promoting seismic safety in Tennessee; and

Do any and all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 2006, ch. 905, § 3.

58-9-103. Comprehensive program to prepare for responding to a major earthquake.

The commission shall initiate, with the assistance and participation of other state, federal and local government agencies, a comprehensive program to prepare the state for responding to a major earthquake. The program shall be implemented in order to create specific tools or products to be used by governments in responding to an earthquake, such as educational materials for citizens. This program may be implemented on a prototypical basis in one (1) area of the state affected by earthquake predictions; provided, that the program is useful for application in other areas of the state upon its completion.

Acts 2006, ch. 905, § 4.

58-9-104. Commission responsibilities.

The commission is responsible for all of the following in connection with earthquake hazard mitigation:

Setting goals and priorities in the public and private sectors;

Requesting appropriate state agencies, including the emergency management agency, to devise criteria to promote earthquake and disaster safety;

Recommending program changes to state agencies, local agencies and the private sector where the changes would improve earthquake hazards and reduction;

Reviewing the recovery and reconstruction efforts after damaging earthquakes;

Gathering, analyzing and disseminating information;

Encouraging research;

Helping to coordinate the earthquake safety activities of government at all levels; and

Establishing and maintaining necessary working relationships with any boards, commissions, departments and agencies or other public or private organizations.

Acts 2006, ch. 905, § 5.

58-9-105. Implementation.

To implement its responsibilities, the commission may:

Review state budgets and review grant proposals, other than those grant proposals submitted by institutions of postsecondary education to the federal government, for earthquake-related activities and to advise the governor and the general assembly thereon;

Review programs relating to earthquake safety and advise the governor and the general assembly concerning earthquake hazard mitigation proposals; and

Recommend the addition, deletion or changing of state and local agency standards when, in the commission's view, the existing situation creates undue hazards or when new developments would promote earthquake hazard mitigation.

Acts 2006, ch. 905, § 6.